Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.200

Canvassing procedure—Refusal to certify—Penalty.

(1) Before canvassing the returns of a primary or election, the chair of the county legislative authority or the chair's designee shall administer an oath to the county auditor or the auditor's designee attesting to the authenticity of the information presented to the canvassing board. This oath must be signed by the county auditor or designee and filed with the returns of the primary or election.

(2) The county canvassing board shall proceed to verify the results from the ballots received. The board shall execute a certificate of the results of the primary or election signed by all members of the board or their designees. Failure to certify the returns, if they can be ascertained with reasonable certainty, is a crime under RCW 29A.84.720.

(3) If the county canvassing board refuses to certify the results of the election without cause, the secretary of state may examine the records, ballots, and results of the election and certify the results of the election. This must be completed within two business days after the certification deadline in RCW 29A.60.190 after the refusal of the county canvassing board to certify the results of the election.

[ 2024 c 28 s 5; 2011 c 10 s 60; 2003 c 111 s 1520; 1990 c 59 s 63; 1965 c 9 s 29.62.040. Prior: 1957 c 195 s 17; prior: (i) 1919 c 163 s 21, part; Code 1881 s 3095, part; 1868 p 20 s 1, part; 1865 p 39 s 6, part; RRS s 5340, part. (ii) 1893 c 112 s 2; RRS s 5342. (iii) 1903 c 85 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 3094, part; 1865 p 38 s 4, part; RRS s 5339, part. Formerly RCW 29.62.040.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.